District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-308.11

Limitation of actions; activities antedating this article; burden of proof.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 811, 32 DCR 7396
as added Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(ff), 44 DCR 1423
May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 3, 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 3, 46 DCR 2118
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.11.